Maryland, session 2026, HB1334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–148.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ON OR BEFORE THE START OF THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY BOARD
SHALL DEVELOP A COMPREHENSIVE PARENT AND FAMILY ENGAGEMENT POLICY.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PARENT AND FAMILY ENGAGEMENT POLICY
IS TO:
(I) PROVIDE THE PARENTS OF STUDENTS ENROLLED IN THE
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM WITH MEANINGFUL OPPORTUNITIES TO PARTICIPATE IN
THE DECISIONS OF THE COUNTY BOARD AND COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT THAT
PERTAIN TO THE EDUCATION OF STUDENTS WITHIN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM;
AND
(II) ASSIST PARENTS AND PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN COLLABORATING
ON THE EDUCATION OF STUDENTS ENROLLED IN EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL.
(3) THE PARENT AND FAMILY ENGAGEMENT POLICY DEVELOPED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) BE ESTABLISHED IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PARENTS OF
STUDENTS ENROLLED IN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM;
(II) ESTABLISH A FRAMEWORK FOR A PARENT–SCHOOL
COMPACT TO BE USED BY EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING GENERAL PROCEDURAL RULES FOR THE CREATION OF THE COMPACT;
(III) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO PARENTS SEEKING TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE PARENT–SCHOOL COMPACT,
INCLUDING BY PROVIDING TRANSLATION SERVICES AND TRAINING;

HOUSE BILL 1334 3
(IV) BUILD CAPACITY IN EACH SCHOOL FOR SUBSTANTIVE
PARENTAL ENGAGEMENT, INCLUDING BY PROVIDING TRAINING, MATERIALS, AND
SUPPORT FOR SCHOOL STAFF WHO SEEK TO ENGAGE PARENTS;
(V) COORDINATE AND INTEGRATE THE FAMILY AND PARENT
ENGAGEMENT STRATEGIES ADOPTED AS PART OF THE POLICY WITH OTHER
RELEVANT FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS AND POLICIES;
(VI) PROVIDE AN OPPORTUNITY, AT LEAST ONCE A YEAR, FOR
PARENTS TO EVALUATE THE POLICY FOR EFFECTIVENESS AND CONTRIBUTE
FEEDBACK TO IMPROVE THE POLICY; AND
(VII) BE REVISED AT LEAST ONCE A YEAR TO REMOVE BARRIERS
TO PARENTAL INVOLVEMENT AND ADDRESS THE NEEDS OF PARENTS SEEKING TO
ASSIST IN THE EDUCATION OF THEIR CHILDREN.
(4) THE PARENT AND FAMILY ENGAGEMENT POLICY SHALL BE
DOCUMENTED IN WRITING AND PUBLISHED ON THE WEBSITE OF THE COUNTY
BOARD.
(5) IF THE COUNTY BOARD HAS AN EXISTING PARENT AND FAMILY
ENGAGEMENT POLICY, INCLUDING A POLICY ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE FEDERAL EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT, THE COUNTY BOARD MAY AMEND
THAT POLICY TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
BEGINNING IN THE 2028–2029 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL
DEVELOP A PARENT–SCHOOL COMPACT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF A COMPACT IS TO CLEARLY DEFINE THE
RESPONSIBILITIES AND ROLES OF SCHOOL STAFF, PARENTS, AND STUDENTS IN THE
EDUCATION OF EACH STUDENT, INCLUDING:
(I) THE COUNTY BOARD’S AND SCHOOL’S RESPONSIBILITY TO
PROVIDE HIGH–QUALITY CURRICULUM AND INSTRUCTION ALIGNED TO THE STATE
STANDARDS AND CURRICULAR FRAMEWORKS IN A SUPPORTIVE AND EFFECTIVE
LEARNING ENVIRONMENT;
(II) THE WAYS PARENTS ARE RESPONSIBLE FOR SUPPORTING
THEIR STUDENT’S LEARNING AND ACADEMIC PROGRESS, INCLUDING MONITORING
ATTENDANCE, HOMEWORK ASSISTANCE AND COMPLETION, AND PARTICIPATION IN
EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITIES;

HOUSE BILL 1334
(III) A PARENT’S RIGHT TO KNOW THE QUALIFICATIONS AND
CREDENTIALS OF THE EDUCATORS TEACHING OR PROVIDING EDUCATIONAL OR
OTHER SERVICES TO THEIR STUDENT, INCLUDING TIMELY NOTIFICATION THAT AN
ASSIGNED TEACHER OF 4 OR MORE WEEKS HOLDS A CONDITIONAL TEACHING
LICENSE OR IS TEACHING A SUBJECT MATTER FOR WHICH THE TEACHER DOES NOT
HOLD A LICENSE; AND
(IV) THE SCHOOL’S RESPONSIBILITY TO PROVIDE MEANINGFUL
OPPORTUNITIES FOR ONGOING COMMUNICATION BETWEEN A STUDENT’S PARENTS
AND TEACHERS, INCLUDING, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, IN THE LANGUAGE
THAT THE PARENT SPEAKS:
1. ANNUAL PARENT–TEACHER CONFERENCES;
2. FREQUENT REPORTS ON STUDENT ACADEMIC
PROGRESS; AND
3. REGULAR OPPORTUNITIES FOR THE PARENT TO
MEET WITH SCHOOL STAFF.
(3) IN DEVELOPING A COMPACT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SCHOOL AND PARENTS SHALL ENSURE THE COMPACT:
(I) FOLLOWS THE COMPREHENSIVE PARENT AND FAMILY
ENGAGEMENT POLICY DEVELOPED BY THE COUNTY BOARD;
(II) IS DEVELOPED USING A COLLABORATIVE PROCESS,
INCLUDING THE COLLECTION AND USE OF INPUT FROM THE SCHOOL AND PARENTS
REGARDING PLANNING, ORGANIZATION, REVIEW, IMPLEMENTATION, DETERMINING
THE INITIAL TERMS, AND AN AMENDMENT PROCESS; AND
(III) IS WRITTEN USING PLAIN AND CLEAR LANGUAGE
UNDERSTANDABLE TO ALL PARENTS, INCLUDING, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, IN
THE LANGUAGE THAT PARENTS SPEAK.
(4) (I) EACH SCHOOL SHALL CONVENE AN ANNUAL MEETING FOR
PARENTS TO:
1. REVIEW AND DISCUSS THE TERMS AND CONTENT OF
THE COMPACT;

HOUSE BILL 1334 5
2. UPDATE PARENTS ON THE SCHOOL’S ACADEMIC
PROGRAMS AND CURRICULUM USED FOR VARIOUS ACADEMIC SUBJECTS,
INCLUDING OPPORTUNITIES FOR PARENTS TO REVIEW CURRICULAR MATERIALS;
AND
3. INFORM PARENTS OF THE ASSESSMENTS USED TO
MEASURE STUDENT AND SCHOOL PROGRESS AND THE EXPECTED LEVELS OF
PROFICIENCY IN REPORTED SUBJECTS.
(II) DURING THE ANNUAL MEETING, THE SCHOOL SHALL:
1. PROVIDE PARENTS WITH TRAINING MATERIALS TO
ASSIST PARENTS SEEKING TO IMPROVE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT; AND
2. OFFER PARENTS MEANINGFUL OPPORTUNITIES TO
PROVIDE FEEDBACK ON THE TERMS OF THE COMPACT, INCLUDING PROPOSING
AMENDMENTS TO THE COMPACT.
(III) THE ANNUAL MEETING SHALL:
1. TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, HOLD DISCUSSIONS IN
LANGUAGES THAT PARENTS SPEAK; AND
2. BE SCHEDULED AT A CONVENIENT TIME FOR
PARENTS AND CONSIDER FLEXIBLE MODES OF MEETINGS IN ORDER TO MAXIMIZE
PARENTAL PARTICIPATION.
(IV) THE SCHOOL SHALL SEEK TO MAXIMIZE THE
PARTICIPATION OF PARENTS WITH DIVERSE NEEDS IN THE ANNUAL MEETING,
INCLUDING THE PARENTS OF:
1. STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES;
2. ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNERS;
3. HOMELESS CHILDREN; AND
4. STUDENTS WITH FEDERAL VISAS.
(5) THE COMPACT SHALL BE POSTED IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE ON
THE WEBSITE OF THE PUBLIC SCHOOL AND UPDATED EACH TIME THE COMPACT IS
REVISED OR AMENDED, INCLUDING A NOTATION OF THE TIME AND DATE OF THE
REVISION OR AMENDMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1334
(6) (I) IF A SCHOOL HAS AN EXISTING COMPACT, THE SCHOOL MAY
AMEND THE COMPACT TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) A COMPACT ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL EVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACT SHALL FULFILL
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT A
CERTIFICATION THAT THE COUNTY BOARD IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE TERMS OF
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION EACH YEAR.
(2) EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COUNTY BOARD A
CERTIFICATION THAT THE PUBLIC SCHOOL IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE TERMS OF
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION EACH YEAR.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE GUIDANCE AND TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE TO A COUNTY BOARD OR PUBLIC SCHOOL THAT NEEDS ASSISTANCE IN
IMPLEMENTING THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.